District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3803

Eligibility.

Repealed.

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 4, 39 DCR 3189
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 45-2223.
D.C. Law 12-59, title XI, § 1101 ( 44 DCR 7356), eff. March 20, 1998, provided for the temporary repeal of §§ 45-2221 to 45-2226 [1981 Ed.]. Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect.”